Tennessee, session 114, SB2614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-1-402, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) Notwithstanding any provision or law to the contrary, a county legislative
body may establish the compensation level for the director of accounts and budget when
they operate under the County Purchasing Law of 1957, compiled in chapter 14, part 1
of this title.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2614
011961
- 1 -